Alaska, session 34, SB168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 47.07.030(b) is amended to read: 05 (b) In addition to the mandatory services specified in (a) of this section and the 06 services provided under (d) of this section, the department may offer only the 07 following optional services: case management services for traumatic or acquired brain 08 injury; case management and nutrition services for pregnant women; personal care 09 services in a recipient's home; emergency hospital services; long-term care 10 noninstitutional services; medical supplies and equipment; advanced practice 11 registered nurse services; clinic services; rehabilitative services for children eligible 12 for services under AS 47.07.063, substance abusers, and emotionally disturbed or 13 chronically mentally ill adults; targeted case management services; inpatient 14 psychiatric facility services for individuals 65 years of age or older and individuals 01 under 21 years of age; psychologists' services; clinical social workers' services; marital 02 and family therapy services; professional counseling services; midwife services; 03 prescribed drugs; physical therapy; occupational therapy; chiropractic services; low- 04 dose mammography screening, as defined in AS 21.42.375(e); hospice care; treatment 05 of speech, hearing, and language disorders; adult dental and dental hygiene services; 06 prosthetic devices and eyeglasses; optometrists' services; intermediate care facility 07 services, including intermediate care facility services for persons with intellectual and 08 developmental disabilities; skilled nursing facility services for individuals under 21 09 years of age; [AND] reasonable transportation to and from the point of medical care; 10 and family planning services and supplies to individuals of child-bearing age who 11 are not pregnant and whose household income does not exceed 225 percent of the 12 federal poverty line as defined by the United States Department of Health and 13 Human Services and revised under 42 U.S.C. 9902(2). 14 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 15 read: 16 MEDICAID STATE PLAN FEDERAL APPROVAL. To the extent necessary to 17 implement this Act, the Department of Health shall amend and submit for federal approval the 18 state plan for medical assistance coverage consistent with AS 47.07.030(b), as amended by 19 sec. 1 of this Act. 20 * Sec. 3. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 21 read: 22 CONDITIONAL EFFECT; NOTIFICATION. (a) This Act takes effect only if, on or 23 before January 1, 2026, the United States Department of Health and Human Services 24 (1) approves the amendments to the state plan for medical assistance coverage 25 under AS 47.07.030(b); or 26 (2) determines that its approval of the amendments to the state plan for 27 medical assistance coverage under AS 47.07.030(b) is not necessary. 28 (b) The commissioner of health shall notify the revisor of statutes in writing within 30 29 days after the United States Department of Health and Human Services approves the 30 amendments to the state plan or determines that approval is not necessary under this section. 31 * Sec. 4. If this Act takes effect, it takes effect January 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.